Utah statutes.
10-3-702.   Extent of power exercised by ordinance.
The governing body may pass any ordinance to regulate, require, prohibit,
govern, control or supervise any activity, business, conduct or condition
authorized by this act or any other provision of law.  An officer of the
municipality may not be convicted of a criminal offense where he relied on or
enforced an ordinance he reasonably believed to be a valid ordinance.  It
shall be a defense to any action for punitive damages that the official acted
in good faith in enforcing an ordinance or that he enforced an ordinance on
advice of legal counsel.
